Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 24A District Court

24A.010.
Jurisdiction of District Court — Court of record and continuous session.

The District Court is a court of limited jurisdiction; it has original jurisdiction in all matters specified in KRS

24A.110

to

24A.130

.

The District Court may be authorized by law to adjudicate the actions or decisions of local administrative agencies, special districts, or boards. Such adjudication shall not constitute an appeal but an original action.

The District Court has no appellate jurisdiction.

The District Court is a court of record.

The District Court is a court of continuous session. Sessions of the District Court may be scheduled at such times, including nights, weekends, and holidays, and at such locations, as may be convenient, subject to the direction of the Supreme Court by rule or order.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 1; 1998, ch. 517, § 5, effective September 1, 1998; 2003, ch. 66, § 14, effective June 24, 2003.

24A.020.
Exclusive jurisdiction granted District Court by statute — Exception.

When jurisdiction over any matter is granted to District Court by statute, such jurisdiction shall be deemed to be exclusive unless the statute specifically states that the jurisdiction shall be concurrent.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 1, effective January 1, 1978.

24A.030.
Judicial districts. [Effective until January 2, 2023]

The state is divided into judicial districts, each to be composed of the following counties:

First Judicial District. Fulton and Hickman.

Second Judicial District. McCracken.

Third Judicial District. Christian.

Fourth Judicial District. Hopkins.

Fifth Judicial District. Crittenden, Union, and Webster.

Sixth Judicial District. Daviess.

Seventh Judicial District. Logan and Todd.

Eighth Judicial District. Warren.

Ninth Judicial District. Hardin.

Tenth Judicial District. Hart and Larue.

Eleventh Judicial District. Green, Marion, Taylor, and Washington.

Twelfth Judicial District. Henry, Oldham, and Trimble.

Thirteenth Judicial District. Garrard, Jessamine, and Lincoln.

Fourteenth Judicial District. Bourbon, Scott, and Woodford.

Fifteenth Judicial District. Carroll, Grant, and Owen.

Sixteenth Judicial District. Kenton.

Seventeenth Judicial District. Campbell.

Eighteenth Judicial District. Harrison, Nicholas, Pendleton, and Robertson.

Nineteenth Judicial District. Bracken, Fleming, and Mason.

Twentieth Judicial District. Greenup and Lewis.

Twenty-first Judicial District. Bath, Menifee, Montgomery, and Rowan.

Twenty-second Judicial District. Fayette.

Twenty-third Judicial District. Estill, Lee, and Owsley.

Twenty-fourth Judicial District. Lawrence, Johnson, and Martin.

Twenty-fifth Judicial District. Clark and Madison.

Twenty-sixth Judicial District. Harlan.

Twenty-seventh Judicial District. Knox and Laurel.

Twenty-eighth Judicial District. Pulaski and Rockcastle.

Twenty-ninth Judicial District. Adair and Casey.

Thirtieth Judicial District. Jefferson.

Thirty-first Judicial District. Floyd.

Thirty-second Judicial District. Boyd.

Thirty-third Judicial District. Perry.

Thirty-fourth Judicial District. Whitley and McCreary.

Thirty-fifth Judicial District. Pike.

Thirty-sixth Judicial District. Magoffin and Knott.

Thirty-seventh Judicial District. Carter, Elliott, and Morgan.

Thirty-eighth Judicial District. Butler, Edmonson, Ohio, and Hancock.

Thirty-ninth Judicial District. Breathitt, Wolfe, and Powell.

Fortieth Judicial District. Clinton, Russell, and Wayne.

Forty-first Judicial District. Clay, Jackson, and Leslie.

Forty-second Judicial District. Calloway.

Forty-third Judicial District. Barren and Metcalfe.

Forty-fourth Judicial District. Bell.

Forty-fifth Judicial District. Muhlenberg and McLean.

Forty-sixth Judicial District. Breckinridge, Grayson, and Meade.

Forty-seventh Judicial District. Letcher.

Forty-eighth Judicial District. Franklin.

Forty-ninth Judicial District. Allen and Simpson.

Fiftieth Judicial District. Boyle and Mercer.

Fifty-first Judicial District. Henderson.

Fifty-second Judicial District. Graves.

Fifty-third Judicial District. Shelby, Anderson, and Spencer.

Fifty-fourth Judicial District. Boone and Gallatin.

Fifty-fifth Judicial District. Bullitt.

Fifty-sixth Judicial District. Caldwell, Livingston, Lyon, and Trigg.

Fifty-seventh Judicial District. Nelson.

Fifty-eighth Judicial District. Marshall.

Fifty-ninth Judicial District. Ballard and Carlisle.

Sixtieth Judicial District. Cumberland and Monroe.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 2; 1984, ch. 311, § 1, effective January 6, 1986; 1986, ch. 251, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 274, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2000, ch. 541, § 3, effective July 1, 2000.

Compiler's Notes.

Section 5 of Acts 2000, ch. 541, effective July 1, 2000, read:

“(1)

The present District Judge who resides in the Twenty-ninth Judicial District as amended by Section 3 of this Act [this section] shall remain the District Judge for the Twenty-ninth Judicial District.

“(2)

The present District Judge of the former Twenty-ninth Judicial District who resides in the Sixtieth Judicial District as created by Section 3 of this Act [this section] shall become the District Judge for the Sixtieth Judicial District.

“(3)

No new vacancy shall be created by Section 3 of this Act [this section]. Each present District Judge shall serve the district, as amended or created by Section 3 of this Act [this section], in which he resides for the remainder of his present elected term.”

24A.030.
Judicial districts. [Effective January 2, 2023; Effective until January 1, 2031]

The state is divided into judicial districts, each to be composed of the following counties:

First Judicial District. Ballard, Carlisle, Fulton, and Hickman.

Second Judicial District. McCracken.

Third Judicial District. Christian.

Fourth Judicial District. Hopkins.

Fifth Judicial District. Crittenden, Union, and Webster.

Sixth Judicial District. Daviess.

Seventh Judicial District. Logan and Todd.

Eighth Judicial District. Warren.

Ninth Judicial District. Hardin.

Tenth Judicial District. Hart and Larue.

Eleventh Judicial District. Green, Marion, Taylor, and Washington.

Twelfth Judicial District. Henry, Oldham, and Trimble.

Thirteenth Judicial District. Garrard, Jessamine, and Lincoln.

Fourteenth Judicial District. Bourbon, Scott, and Woodford.

Fifteenth Judicial District. Carroll, Grant, and Owen.

Sixteenth Judicial District. Kenton.

Seventeenth Judicial District. Campbell.

Eighteenth Judicial District. Harrison, Nicholas, Pendleton, and Robertson.

Nineteenth Judicial District. Bracken, Fleming, and Mason.

Twentieth Judicial District. Greenup and Lewis.

Twenty-first Judicial District. Bath, Menifee, Montgomery, and Rowan.

Twenty-second Judicial District. Fayette.

Twenty-third Judicial District. Estill, Lee, and Owsley.

Twenty-fourth Judicial District. Lawrence, Johnson, and Martin.

Twenty-fifth Judicial District. Clark and Madison.

Twenty-sixth Judicial District. Harlan.

Twenty-seventh Judicial District. Knox and Laurel.

Twenty-eighth Judicial District. Pulaski and Rockcastle.

Twenty-ninth Judicial District. Adair and Casey.

Thirtieth Judicial District. Jefferson.

Thirty-first Judicial District. Floyd.

Thirty-second Judicial District. Boyd.

Thirty-third Judicial District. Perry.

Thirty-fourth Judicial District. Whitley and McCreary.

Thirty-fifth Judicial District. Pike.

Thirty-sixth Judicial District. Magoffin and Knott.

Thirty-seventh Judicial District. Carter, Elliott, and Morgan.

Thirty-eighth Judicial District. Butler, Edmonson, Ohio, and Hancock.

Thirty-ninth Judicial District. Breathitt, Wolfe, and Powell.

Fortieth Judicial District. Clinton, Russell, and Wayne.

Forty-first Judicial District. Clay, Jackson, and Leslie.

Forty-second Judicial District. Calloway.

Forty-third Judicial District. Barren and Metcalfe.

Forty-fourth Judicial District. Bell.

Forty-fifth Judicial District. Muhlenberg and McLean.

Forty-sixth Judicial District. Breckinridge, Grayson, and Meade.

Forty-seventh Judicial District. Letcher.

Forty-eighth Judicial District. Franklin.

Forty-ninth Judicial District. Allen and Simpson.

Fiftieth Judicial District. Boyle and Mercer.

Fifty-first Judicial District. Henderson.

Fifty-second Judicial District. Graves.

Fifty-third Judicial District. Shelby, Anderson, and Spencer.

Fifty-fourth Judicial District. Boone and Gallatin.

Fifty-fifth Judicial District. Bullitt.

Fifty-sixth Judicial District. Caldwell, Livingston, Lyon, and Trigg.

Fifty-seventh Judicial District. Nelson.

Fifty-eighth Judicial District. Marshall.

Fifty-ninth Judicial District. Cumberland and Monroe.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 2; 1984, ch. 311, § 1, effective January 6, 1986; 1986, ch. 251, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 274, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2000, ch. 541, § 3, effective July 1, 2000; 2018 ch. 57, § 8, effective January 2, 2023.

Compiler's Notes.

For this section as effective until January 2, 2023, see the bound volume.

24A.030.
Judicial districts. [Effective January 1, 2031]

The state is divided into judicial districts, each to be composed of the following counties:

First Judicial District. Ballard, Carlisle, Fulton, and Hickman.

Second Judicial District. McCracken.

Third Judicial District. Christian.

Fourth Judicial District. Hopkins.

Fifth Judicial District. Crittenden, Union, and Webster.

Sixth Judicial District. Daviess.

Seventh Judicial District. Logan and Todd.

Eighth Judicial District. Edmonson and Warren.

Ninth Judicial District. Hardin.

Tenth Judicial District. Hart and Larue.

Eleventh Judicial District. Green, Marion, Taylor, and Washington.

Twelfth Judicial District. Henry, Oldham, and Trimble.

Thirteenth Judicial District. Garrard, Jessamine, and Lincoln.

Fourteenth Judicial District. Bourbon, Scott, and Woodford.

Fifteenth Judicial District. Carroll, Grant, and Owen.

Sixteenth Judicial District. Kenton.

Seventeenth Judicial District. Campbell.

Eighteenth Judicial District. Harrison, Nicholas, Pendleton, and Robertson.

Nineteenth Judicial District. Bracken, Fleming, and Mason.

Twentieth Judicial District. Greenup and Lewis.

Twenty-first Judicial District. Bath, Menifee, Montgomery, and Rowan.

Twenty-second Judicial District. Fayette.

Twenty-third Judicial District. Estill, Lee, and Owsley.

Twenty-fourth Judicial District. Lawrence, Johnson, and Martin.

Twenty-fifth Judicial District. Clark and Madison.

Twenty-sixth Judicial District. Harlan.

Twenty-seventh Judicial District. Knox and Laurel.

Twenty-eighth Judicial District. Pulaski and Rockcastle.

Twenty-ninth Judicial District. Adair and Casey.

Thirtieth Judicial District. Jefferson.

Thirty-first Judicial District. Floyd.

Thirty-second Judicial District. Boyd.

Thirty-third Judicial District. Perry.

Thirty-fourth Judicial District. Whitley and McCreary.

Thirty-fifth Judicial District. Pike.

Thirty-sixth Judicial District. Magoffin and Knott.

Thirty-seventh Judicial District. Carter, Elliott, and Morgan.

Thirty-eighth Judicial District. Butler, Ohio, and Hancock.

Thirty-ninth Judicial District. Breathitt, Wolfe, and Powell.

Fortieth Judicial District. Clinton, Russell, and Wayne.

Forty-first Judicial District. Clay, Jackson, and Leslie.

Forty-second Judicial District. Calloway and Marshall.

Forty-third Judicial District. Barren and Metcalfe.

Forty-fourth Judicial District. Bell.

Forty-fifth Judicial District. Muhlenberg and McLean.

Forty-sixth Judicial District. Breckinridge, Grayson, and Meade.

Forty-seventh Judicial District. Letcher.

Forty-eighth Judicial District. Franklin.

Forty-ninth Judicial District. Allen and Simpson.

Fiftieth Judicial District. Boyle and Mercer.

Fifty-first Judicial District. Henderson.

Fifty-second Judicial District. Graves.

Fifty-third Judicial District. Shelby, Anderson, and Spencer.

Fifty-fourth Judicial District. Boone and Gallatin.

Fifty-fifth Judicial District. Bullitt.

Fifty-sixth Judicial District. Caldwell, Livingston, Lyon, and Trigg.

Fifty-seventh Judicial District. Nelson.

Fifty-eighth Judicial District. Cumberland and Monroe.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 2; 1984, ch. 311, § 1, effective January 6, 1986; 1986, ch. 251, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 274, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2000, ch. 541, § 3, effective July 1, 2000; 2022 ch. 129, § 7, effective January 1, 2031.

24A.040.
Judicial districts with one District Judge.

Each judicial district shall have one (1) District Judge, except as otherwise provided.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 3.

24A.050.
Judicial districts with two District Judges and two numbered divisions.
[Effective until January 1, 2031]

The following judicial districts are entitled to two (2) District Judges and shall have two (2) numbered divisions of the District Court:

Second Judicial District.

Third Judicial District.

Fourth Judicial District.

Ninth Judicial District.

Eleventh Judicial District.

Twelfth Judicial District.

Thirteenth Judicial District.

Fourteenth Judicial District.

Fifteenth Judicial District.

Seventeenth Judicial District.

Twenty-first Judicial District.

Twenty-fourth Judicial District.

Twenty-seventh Judicial District.

Twenty-eighth Judicial District.

Thirty-first Judicial District.

Thirty-second Judicial District.

Thirty-fourth Judicial District.

Thirty-fifth Judicial District.

Thirty-eighth Judicial District.

Fortieth Judicial District.

Forty-first Judicial District.

Forty-sixth Judicial District.

Forty-eighth Judicial District.

Fifty-first Judicial District.

Fifty-third Judicial District.

Fifty-fourth Judicial District.

Fifty-sixth Judicial District.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 4; 1978, ch. 90, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 247, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 311, § 2, effective January 6, 1986; 1986, ch. 113, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 274, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 307, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 517, § 7, effective September 1, 1998, September 1, 1999, and January 1, 2000; 2000, ch. 541, § 4, effective July 1, 2000; 2001, ch. 72, § 3, effective June 21, 2001; 2003, ch. 66, § 9, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 173, Pt. XIII, 1.(3), § 4, effective January 1, 2007, 2006, ch. 250, § 4, effective January 1, 2007; 2018 ch. 57, § 5, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2007).
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 250, Part V, sec. 6, provides that the new judgeships created by sections 1 to 5 of that part shall become effective January 1, 2007. The revisions to this statute in that Act supersede those made in 2005 Ky. Acts 173, Pt. XIII, 1.(3), sec. 4, which were also to be effective January 1, 2007. That 2005 version of the statute was used as the base document for the 2006 revisions.

24A.050.
Judicial districts with two District Judges and two numbered divisions. [Effective January 1, 2031]

The following judicial districts are entitled to two (2) District Judges and shall have two (2) numbered divisions of the District Court:

Second Judicial District.

Third Judicial District.

Ninth Judicial District.

Eleventh Judicial District.

Twelfth Judicial District.

Thirteenth Judicial District.

Fourteenth Judicial District.

Seventeenth Judicial District.

Twenty-first Judicial District.

Twenty-fourth Judicial District.

Twenty-seventh Judicial District.

Twenty-eighth Judicial District.

Thirty-second Judicial District.

Thirty-fourth Judicial District.

Thirty-fifth Judicial District.

Forty-sixth Judicial District.

Forty-eighth Judicial District.

Fifty-third Judicial District.

Fifty-fourth Judicial District.

Fifty-sixth Judicial District.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 4; 1978, ch. 90, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 247, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 311, § 2, effective January 6, 1986; 1986, ch. 113, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 274, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 307, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 517, § 7, effective September 1, 1998, September 1, 1999, and January 1, 2000; 2000, ch. 541, § 4, effective July 1, 2000; 2001, ch. 72, § 3, effective June 21, 2001; 2003, ch. 66, § 9, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 173, Pt. XIII, 1.(3), § 4, effective January 1, 2007, 2006, ch. 250, § 4, effective January 1, 2007; 2018 ch. 57, § 5, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 129, § 8, effective January 1, 2031.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2031). 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 129, secs. 13 and 14, as amended by 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 230, sec. 14, read as follows:

“Section 13. (1) The General Assembly requests that the District Court divisions eliminated in the Fourth, Fifteenth, Thirtieth, Thirty-first, Fortieth, Forty-first, and Fifty-first Judicial Districts, and the District Court division eliminated in the newly constituted Thirty-eighth Judicial District and in the newly constituted Forty-second Judicial District be eliminated effective January 1, 2031, except under the circumstances described in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) (a) Should a vacancy occur on or after January 2, 2023, in the Fourth, Fifteenth, Thirty-first, Thirty-eighth, Fortieth, Forty-first, or Fifty-first Judicial District, the numbered division in which the vacancy occurs shall be eliminated immediately upon the occurrence of the vacancy and, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the vacancy shall not be filled by appointment or otherwise, and the division or divisions eliminated shall not appear on the ballot for the November 2026 regular election or the November 2030 regular election. If more than one vacancy occurs in any Judicial District listed in this paragraph, only the initial vacancy shall result in the elimination of a division and shall not be filled. Any additional vacancy shall be filled in accordance with KRS

118A.100

. . . .

Section 14. Unless a District Court division has been eliminated by the occurrence of a vacancy in accordance with Section 13 of this Act, the General Assembly requests that when the two District Court divisions of the Fourth, Fifteenth, Thirty-first, Thirty-eighth, Fortieth, Forty-first, and Fifty-first Judicial District are reduced to one District Court division under Section 8 of this Act [this statute], the division eliminated shall be the higher-numbered division . . . . The divisions that are eliminated shall not appear on the ballot for the November 2030 regular election.”

24A.060.
Judicial districts with three District Judges and three numbered divisions.

The following judicial districts are entitled to three (3) District Judges and shall have three (3) numbered divisions of the District Court:

Sixth Judicial District.

Eighth Judicial District.

Sixteenth Judicial District;

Twenty-fifth Judicial District.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 5; 1996, ch. 307, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 517, § 8, effective September 1, 1998, and September 1, 1999; 2003, ch. 66, § 10, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 173, Pt. XIII, 1.(3), § 5, effective January 1, 2007; 2006, ch. 250, § 5, effective January 1, 2007; 2009, ch. 44, § 3, effective January 3, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2007). 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 250, Part V, sec. 6, provides that the new judgeships created by subsections (2) and (3) of this statute shall become effective January 1, 2007. The revisions to this statute in that Act supersede those made in 2005 Ky. Acts 173, Pt. XIII, 1.(3), sec. 5, which were also to be effective January 1, 2007. That 2005 version of the statute was used as the base document for the 2006 revisions.

24A.070.
Sixteenth Judicial District. [Repealed.]

24A.080.
Twenty-second Judicial District.

The Twenty-second Judicial District is entitled to five (5) District Judges and shall have five (5) numbered divisions of the District Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 7; 2003, ch. 66, § 11, effective June 24, 2003.

24A.090.
Thirtieth Judicial District. [Effective until January 1, 2031]

The Thirtieth Judicial District is entitled to seventeen (17) District Judges and shall have seventeen (17) numbered divisions of the District Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 8; 2003, ch. 66, § 12, effective June 24, 2003.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2031). 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 129, secs. 13 and 14, as amended by 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 230, sec. 14, read as follows:

“Section 13. (1) The General Assembly requests that the District Court divisions eliminated in the Fourth, Fifteenth, Thirtieth, Thirty-first, Fortieth, Forty-first, and Fifty-first Judicial Districts, and the District Court division eliminated in the newly constituted Thirty-eighth Judicial District and in the newly constituted Forty-second Judicial District be eliminated effective January 1, 2031, except under the circumstances described in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) . . . (b) Should a vacancy occur on or after January 2, 2023, in the Thirtieth Judicial District, the numbered division in which the vacancy occurs shall be eliminated immediately upon the occurrence of the vacancy and, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the vacancy shall not be filled by appointment or otherwise, and the division eliminated shall not appear on the ballot for the November 2026 regular election or the November 2030 regular election. If more than one vacancy occurs on or after January 2, 2023, in the Thirtieth Judicial District, only the initial vacancy shall result in the elimination of a division and shall not be filled. Any additional vacancy shall be filled in accordance with KRS

118A.100

.

Section 14. Unless a District Court division has been eliminated by the occurrence of a vacancy in accordance with Section 13 of this Act, the General Assembly requests that . . . when the 17 District Court divisions are reduced to 16 District Court divisions in Section 9 of this Act [this statute], the division eliminated shall be the highest-numbered division. The divisions that are eliminated shall not appear on the ballot for the November 2030 regular election.”

24A.090.
Thirtieth Judicial District. [Effective January 1, 2031]

The Thirtieth Judicial District is entitled to sixteen (16) District Judges and shall have sixteen (16) numbered divisions of the District Court.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 8; 2003, ch. 66, § 12, effective June 24, 2003; 2022 ch. 129, § 9, effective January 1, 2031.

24A.100.
Trial commissioners.

In any county which does not have a District Judge resident in the county there shall be a trial commissioner.

Trial commissioners shall be appointed in the manner required by Section 113 of the Constitution of Kentucky and shall perform such duties as may be directed by the Supreme Court.

Trial commissioners in District Court shall be compensated as provided in the judicial personnel system, provided, however that no trial commissioner shall be compensated at a rate greater than seven thousand two hundred dollars ($7,200) per year. Except that during the disability or suspension of a District Judge for a period in excess of sixty (60) days, a trial commissioner who is qualified as an attorney and who is authorized to perform extraordinary duties, may be compensated by the Supreme Court in an amount not exceeding the salary of a District Judge, provided such trial commissioner shall not engage in the practice of law during the period of extraordinary service.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 9; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 78, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 449, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A person would be prohibited from holding the office of trial commissioner, which is a state office, while at the same time serving as county judge/executive.

OAG 77-661

.

There is no authority under this section for the appointment of a judge pro tem of the District Court or the appointment of a pro tem trial commissioner.

OAG 77-661

.

Since the position of trial commissioner is a state office and membership on the county election board is a county office, an individual would be prohibited from holding both positions at the same time by Const., § 165 and KRS

61.080

.

OAG 80-266

.

A county sheriff must execute and make due return on all criminal process lawfully issued by a county trial commissioner (process as authorized by SCR

5.030

) and placed in the sheriff’s hands or with his lawful deputies.

OAG 80-332

.

The positions of deputy circuit clerk, a state officer under KRS

30A.010

, and trial commissioner of the county District Court, a state officer under this section are compatible with one another, since neither Const., § 165, nor KRS

61.080

prohibits a person from holding two state offices at the same time; however, they may be incompatible under the doctrine of practical or common law.

OAG 81-124

.

A lawyer who represents defendants in criminal cases cannot also be appointed to the position of trial commissioner pursuant to this section and Const., § 113, since the judicial functions of the trial commissioner are inherently inconsistent and repugnant to the role of a defense attorney in criminal cases, and, in addition, the trial commissioner of one district court cannot personally appear in criminal matters before another District Court within the same judicial district.

OAG 81-177

.

If a city has either established a position of legal advisor as a form of city employment or created the office of city attorney, no one could hold at the same time the state office of trial commissioner and the office of city attorney or city employment without violating Const., § 165 and KRS

61.080

. However, if an attorney is employed on a personal service contract basis, he would be considered an independent contractor and there would be no constitutional or statutory objection to his serving as trial commissioner of the District Court.

OAG 82-502

.

24A.110.
Criminal jurisdiction.

The District Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to make final disposition of all criminal matters, including violations of county, urban-county, or city ordinances or codes, except:

Offenses denominated by statute as felonies or capital offenses; and

Offenses punishable by death or imprisonment in the penitentiary.

The District Court has exclusive jurisdiction to make a final disposition of any charge or a public offense denominated as a misdemeanor or violation, except where the charge is joined with an indictment for a felony, and all violations of county, urban-county, or city ordinances and, prior to trial, to commit the defendant to jail or hold him to bail or other form of pretrial release.

The District Court has, concurrent with Circuit Court, jurisdiction to examine any charge of a public offense denominated as a felony or capital offense or which may be punished by death or imprisonment in the penitentiary and to commit the defendant to jail or hold him to bail or other form of pretrial release.

The District Court may, upon motion and for good cause shown, reduce a charge of a felony to a misdemeanor in accordance with the Rules of Criminal Procedure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 2; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 10.

24A.120.
Civil and probate jurisdiction.

District Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction in:

Civil cases in which the amount in controversy does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), exclusive of interest and costs, except matters affecting title to real estate and matters of equity; however, nothing herein shall prohibit execution levy on real estate in enforcement of judgment of District Court;

Matters involving probate, except matters contested in an adversary proceeding. Such adversary proceeding shall be filed in Circuit Court in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure and shall not be considered an appeal;

Matters not provided for by statute to be commenced in Circuit Court shall be deemed to be nonadversarial within the meaning of subsection (2) of this section and therefore are within the jurisdiction of the District Court; and

Matters involving trusts in accordance with KRS

386B.2-030

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 11; 1978, ch. 384, § 122, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 54, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 259, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 188, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 137, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 517, § 6, effective September 1, 1998; 2002, ch. 320, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 66, § 15, effective June 24, 2003; 2011, ch. 91, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2014, ch. 25, § 96, effective July 15, 2014.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/8/2011).
2011 Ky. Acts ch. 91, sec. 4, provides that “any case which has been filed in a Circuit Court or District Court prior to the effective date of this Act (June 8, 2011) and the change in jurisdictional amounts (made by
2011 Ky. Acts ch. 91) shall remain in the court in which the case was originally filed, until the disposition of the case.”

(6/24/2003). Under the authority of
KRS

7.136

, the Reviser of Statutes has renumbered the paragraphs and subsections of this section. To conform with this renumbering, a reference in subsection (3) to “paragraph (b) of this subsection” has been changed to read “subsection (2) of this section.”

24A.130.
Juvenile jurisdiction.

The juvenile jurisdiction of District Court shall be exclusive in all cases relating to minors in which jurisdiction is not vested by law in some other court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 12.

24A.140.
Services provided by sheriff or city police — Compensation — Alternate arrangements with other law enforcement officers or agencies.

When sessions of District Court are held in:

The county courthouse or other county-owned facility;

Urban-county facilities;

State-owned, leased, or controlled facilities;

Special district facilities; or

Private facilities;

the sheriff shall be responsible for attending court, keeping order, and providing the same services to District Court as are provided to the Circuit Court.

The sheriff shall be compensated for these services in the same manner and at the same rates as for similar services rendered to the Circuit Court.

When sessions of District Court are held in city facilities, the city police shall be responsible for attending court, keeping order, and providing the same services to District Court as are provided by the sheriff to Circuit Court. Compensation for these services shall be the same as allowed to the sheriff as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

If the Administrative Office of the Courts determines that the provision of services by any law enforcement officer or agency named herein would place an undue burden on such officer or agency, the Administrative Office of the Courts may arrange with any other law enforcement officer or agency in the Commonwealth to provide such services. Compensation shall be as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 28, § 13; 2019 ch. 44, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

24A.150.
Procedure for transfer of coverage for judge formerly under plan established by city of second or third class.

If a person covered by a pension plan established under KRS

26.650

or 26.653 is elected as a District Judge before January 1, 1978, the provisions of subsections (2) to (5) of KRS

61.527

shall be carried out by the governing body of any pension plan applying to District Judges.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 23, § 2, effective January 1, 1978.

24A.170.
Fees and costs for civil cases.

The Supreme Court shall by rule set the filing fees and miscellaneous costs for civil cases filed in the District Court.

The following fee shall be paid directly to the sheriff or other officer serving the process by the party requesting the service, at the time of the request:

Service of process (per process)
. . . . .
$20.00

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 59, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 200, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 141, § 137, effective July 1, 1982; 1982, ch. 159, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 266, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 445, § 35, effective July 1, 1982; 1990, ch. 234, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 134, § 5, effective July 1, 1994; 1996, ch. 248, § 5, effective July 15, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

This section was amended in 1982 Acts Chapter 445, which contains the following language in Section 45 of that Act: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1982.” The Ky. Constitution, in Section 55, requires that a reason be set forth for the emergency. However, no reason is set forth in this Act. The effective date for 1982 Acts with no emergency provision was July 15, 1982.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Commonwealth, except for the provisions of KRS

416.620

, pertaining to proceedings for eminent domain, is exempt from paying costs, although it may, pursuant to KRS

453.010

, pay costs when such costs are approved and allowed by the judge of the court in which the case was filed.

OAG 78-343

.

If the sheriff must make a return on the item or document, he is entitled to a fee for service, regardless of whether the process is served alone or in a group with other process, but if no return is required on the document (i.e., a pleading) he may not charge the fee.

OAG 79-510

.

The word “process” as used in KRS

23A.200

and this section does not refer to every legal document, but is a technical term which refers to documents, such as summonses, by which the court may command a person to appear in an action or before the court, or the means, such as a temporary restraining order, whereby the court compels compliance with its demands.

OAG 79-510

.

The advance fees required by KRS

23A.200

and this section would have to be paid by an urban county government in civil actions to which it was a party.

OAG 83-186

.

If a sheriff refuses to serve process on the ground that the requester owes him for an unrelated fee, the sheriff would be in violation of KRS

70.070

and would be liable on his official bond for such neglect of duty; he would also be subject to the court’s holding him in contempt, since the illegal failure to serve summons would constitute an interference with the proper exercise of the court’s judicial functions.

OAG 84-114

.

A sheriff may not refuse to serve a properly issued process for the requester for the reason that the requester owes him a fee bill involving an unrelated matter.

OAG 84-114

.

A sheriff can legally refuse to serve or attempt to serve a civil summons where he has not yet been paid to serve it.

OAG 84-114

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Illegitimacy and Paternity Proceedings, § 31.30.

24A.175.
Court costs for criminal cases in District Court — Payment required — Exceptions — Treatment of minor defendant.

Court costs for a criminal case in the District Court shall be one hundred dollars ($100), regardless of whether the offense is one for which prepayment is permitted.

There shall be no court costs for a parking citation when:

The fine is paid to the clerk before the trial date in the same manner as provided for speeding citations under KRS 189.394(3); and

The citation does not involve parking in a fire lane or blocking the traveled portion of the highway.

The taxation of court costs against a defendant, upon conviction in a case, including persons sentenced to state traffic school as provided under KRS

186.574

, shall be mandatory and shall not be subject to probation, suspension, proration, deduction, or other form of nonimposition in the terms of a plea bargain or otherwise, unless the court finds that the defendant is a poor person as defined by KRS 453.190(2) and that he or she is unable to pay court costs and will be unable to pay the court costs in the foreseeable future.

If the court finds that the defendant does not meet the standard articulated in subsection (3) of this section and that the defendant is nonetheless unable to pay the full amount of the court costs, fees, or fines at the time of sentencing, then the court may establish an installment payment plan in accordance with KRS

534.020

.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the court shall not adjudicate a traffic violation involving a defendant who is under the age of eighteen (18), unless the person that assumed liability of the minor under the provisions of KRS 186. 590 is present. This subsection shall not apply to emancipated minors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 60, effective January 2, 1978; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 1979; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 1, effective May 12, 1979; 1980, ch. 268, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 235, § 19, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 266, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 141, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 321, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 415, § 10, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 198, § 18, effective October 1, 1996; 1998, ch. 606, § 159, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 328, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 512, § 12, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 183, § 4, effective August 1, 2002; 2014, ch. 81, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 158, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2014). 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 81, sec. 3 provided that the amendments made to this statute in Section 2 of that Act shall be known as the “Denzel Steward Act of 2014.”